apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="aquel__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ún__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>unes</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>una</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>unos</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>unu</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ún</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/el_mio__prn">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>mio</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>mio</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>mios</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>mios</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>míu</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>mía</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>mío</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>míos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>míes</l> 
        <r>el<b/>mio<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/el_to__prn">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>to</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>to</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>tos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>tos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>tuyu</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>tuya</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>tuyo</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>tuyos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>tuyes</l> 
        <r>el<b/>to<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/el_so__prn">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>so</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>so</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>sos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>sos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>suyu</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>suya</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>suyo</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>suyos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>suyes</l> 
        <r>el<b/>so<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/el_nuesu__prn">
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>nuesu</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>nuestru</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>nuesa</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>nuestra</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>nueso</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>nuestro</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>nuestros</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>nuesos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>nueses</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>nuestres</l> 
        <r>el<b/>nuesu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquél"><i>aquél</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ún"><i></i><par n="ún__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el mio"><par n="/el_mio__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el to"><par n="/el_to__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el so"><par n="/el_so__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el nuesu"><par n="/el_nuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquél"><i>aquél</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ún"><i></i><par n="ún__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el mio"><par n="/el_mio__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el to"><par n="/el_to__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el so"><par n="/el_so__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el nuesu"><par n="/el_nuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquél"><i>aquél</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquél"><i>aquél</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ún"><i></i><par n="ún__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el mio"><par n="/el_mio__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el to"><par n="/el_to__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el so"><par n="/el_so__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el nuesu"><par n="/el_nuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquél"><i>aquél</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ún"><i></i><par n="ún__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el mio"><par n="/el_mio__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el to"><par n="/el_to__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el so"><par n="/el_so__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el nuesu"><par n="/el_nuesu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquel"><i>aquel</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aquél"><i>aquél</i><par n="aquel__prn"/></e>
